ko: 심지 사용 영역: 아플리케; 가방 및 토트백; 단추 구멍; 칼라 및 커프스; 공예 프로젝트; 자수 안정화; 안단; 모자; 밑단; 홈 데코 재봉; 플래킷; 포켓; 퀼팅; 웨이스트밴드; 기타
hu: Közbélés alkalmazási terület: Rátét; Táskák és szatyrok; Gomblyukak; Gallérok és kézelők; Kézműves projektek; Hímzésstabilizálás; Alátétek; Kalapok; Felhajtások / Szegélyek; Lakásdekoráció varrása; Gombolópántok; Zsebek; Szteppelés / Tűzés; Derékpántok; Egyéb
it: Area di applicazione dell'interfodera: Appliqué; Borse e borsoni; Asole; Colletti e polsini; Progetti artigianali; Stabilizzazione per ricamo; Paramonture; Cappelli; Orli; Cucito per decorazioni da casa; Fintini; Tasche; Trapuntatura; Fasce in vita; Altro
ja: インターフェース用途エリア: アップリケ; バッグ・トート; ボタンホール; 襟・袖口; クラフトプロジェクト; 刺繍の安定化; 見返し; 帽子; 裾; ホームデコ縫製; 前立て; ポケット; キルティング; ウエストバンド; その他
cs: Propojení aplikační oblasti: Aplikace; Tašky a kabelky; Knoflíkové dírky; Límce a manžety; Řemeslné projekty; Stabilizace výšivky; Podsádky; Klobouky a čepice; Lemy; Šití bytových dekorací; Légy; Kapsy; Prošívání; Pasovky; Jiné
zh-TW: 襯布適用範圍: 貼花; 包款與托特包; 鈕扣孔; 衣領與袖口; 手工藝專案; 刺繡穩定; 貼邊; 帽子; 下擺; 居家裝飾縫紉; 門襟; 口袋; 絎縫; 褲頭/裙頭; 其他
el: Περιοχή εφαρμογής ενισχυτικού υφάσματος: Απλικέ; Τσάντες και tote; Κουμπότρυπες; Γιακάδες και μανσέτες; Χειροτεχνίες; Σταθεροποίηση κεντήματος; Επενδύσεις (facings); Καπέλα; Στριφώματα; Ράψιμο για διακόσμηση σπιτιού; Πατιλέτες; Τσέπες; Καπιτονέ; Ζωνάρια; Άλλο
de: Anwendungsbereich der Einlage: Applikation; Taschen & Beutel; Knopflöcher; Kragen & Manschetten; Bastelprojekte; Stickerei-Stabilisierung; Belege; Hüte; Säume; Nähen von Heimdekor; Knopfleisten; Taschen; Quilten; Bünde; Sonstige
nb: Bruksommrådet for grensesnittet: Applikasjon; Vesker og nett; Knapphull; Krager og mansjetter; Hobbyprosjekter; Broderistabilisering; Belegg; Hatter; Falder; Interiørsøm; Stolper; Lommer; Quilting; Linninger; Annet
ro-RO: Interfațarea zonei de aplicații: Aplicație; Genți și sacoșe; Butoniere; Gulere și manșete; Proiecte de lucru manual; Stabilizare broderie; Revere; Pălării; Tivuri; Cusut decorațiuni interioare; Fente; Buzunare; Quilting; Betealii; Altele
th: พื้นที่ใช้งานการเชื่อมต่อ: งานปะติดผ้า; กระเป๋าและกระเป๋าโท้ท; รังดุม; ปกเสื้อและปลายแขนเสื้อ; งานคราฟต์; รองหลังงานปัก; สาบเสื้อ; หมวก; ชายผ้า; เย็บของตกแต่งบ้าน; สาบกระดุม; กระเป๋าเสื้อผ้า; งานควิลท์; ขอบเอว; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Área de interface da aplicação: Aplique; Sacos e carteiras; Casas de botão; Colarinhos e punhos; Projetos de artesanato; Estabilização de bordado; Vistas; Chapéus; Bainhas; Costura de decoração para a casa; Carcelas; Bolsos; Acolchoamento; Cós; Outro
da: Anvendelsesområde for mellemfor: Applikation; Tasker og indkøbsnet; Knaphuller; Kraver og manchetter; Hobbyprojekter; Stabilisering til broderi; Belægninger; Hatte; Oplægninger; Syning til boligindretning; Stolpelukninger; Lommer; Quiltning; Linninger; Andet
tr: Arayüz uygulama alanı: Aplik; Çanta ve torbalar; İlikler; Yaka ve manşetler; El işi projeleri; Nakış sabitleme; Pervazlar; Şapkalar; Etek uçları; Ev dekorasyonu dikişi; Patlar; Cepler; Kapitone; Bel bantları; Diğer
nl: Vlieseline toepassingsgebied: Applicatie; Tassen & draagtassen; Knoopsgaten; Kragen & manchetten; Knutselprojecten; Borduurstabilisatie; Beleg; Hoeden; Zomen; Woondecoratie naaien; Knoopsluitingen; Zakken; Quilten; Taillebanden; Overig
sl-SI: Vmesniško območje aplikacij: Aplikacije; Torbe in nakupovalne vrečke; Gumbnice; Ovratniki in manšete; Ustvarjalni projekti; Stabilizacija pri vezenju; Obrobe; Klobuki; Robovi; Šivanje dekoracije za dom; Gumbne letve; Žepi; Prešivanje (quilting); Pasovi; Drugo
sk-SK: Oblasť použitia rozhrania: Aplikácie; Tašky a kabelky; Gombíkové dierky; Golieri a manžety; Remeselné projekty; Stabilizácia výšivky; Podsádky; Klobúky; Lemy; Šitie bytových doplnkov; Légy; Vrecká; Prešívanie; Pásy; Iné
pl: Obszar aplikacji interfejsu: Aplikacje; Torby i torebki; Dziurki na guziki; Kołnierze i mankiety; Projekty rękodzielnicze; Stabilizacja haftu; Odszycia; Kapelusze; Obszycia dolne; Szycie dekoracji do domu; Plisy zapięciowe; Kieszenie; Pikowanie; Paski; Inne
fi: Tukikankaan käyttöalue: Applikointi; Laukut ja kassit; Napinlävet; Kaulukset ja hihansuut; Askarteluprojektit; Kirjonnan tukeminen; Alavarat; Hatut; Helmat; Sisustusompelu; Halkiot; Taskut; Tilkkutyöt; Vyötärönauhat; Muu
pt-BR: Entretela área de aplicação: Aplique; Bolsas e sacolas; Casas de botões; Colarinhos e punhos; Projetos de artesanato; Estabilização para bordado; Revestimentos; Chapéus; Bainhas; Costura para decoração de casa; Carcelas; Bolsos; Quilting; Cós; Outra
en: Interfacing application area: Appliqué; Bags & totes; Buttonholes; Collars & cuffs; Craft projects; Embroidery stabilization; Facings; Hats; Hems; Home decor sewing; Plackets; Pockets; Quilting; Waistbands; Other
hr-HR: Područje sučelja za aplikacije: Aplikacija; Torbe i platnene torbe; Rupice za gumbe; Ovratnici i manžete; Rukotvorine; Stabilizacija veza; Obrubi; Šeširi; Porubi; Šivanje ukrasa za dom; Lajsne za gumbe; Džepovi; Prošivanje (quilting); Pojasnice; Ostalo
bg-BG: Област на приложение на подлепващия материал: Апликация; Чанти и торбички; Илици; Яки и маншети; Занаятчийски проекти; Стабилизиране на бродерия; Обшивки; Шапки; Подгъви; Шиене на декор за дома; Пластрони; Джобове; Куилтинг; Пояси; Други
fr: Zone d’application de l’entoilage: Appliqué; Sacs et fourre-tout; Boutonnières; Cols et poignets; Projets d’artisanat; Stabilisation de broderie; Parementures; Chapeaux; Ourlets; Couture de décoration d’intérieur; Pattes de boutonnage; Poches; Matelassage; Ceintures; Autre
es: Área de aplicación de interfaz: Apliques; Bolsos y bolsas tote; Ojales; Cuellos y puños; Proyectos de manualidades; Estabilización de bordados; Vistas; Sombreros; Dobladillos; Costura de decoración del hogar; Tapetas; Bolsillos; Acolchado; Pretinas; Otra
ru: Область применения прокладочного материала: Аппликация; Сумки и шопперы; Петли для пуговиц; Воротники и манжеты; Поделки; Стабилизация вышивки; Обтачки; Головные уборы; Подгибы; Пошив домашнего декора; Планки; Карманы; Квилтинг; Пояса; Другое
vi: Lĩnh vực ứng dụng vải lót: Đắp nổi; Túi xách & túi tote; Khuy áo; Cổ áo & cổ tay áo; Sản phẩm thủ công; Cố định thêu; Vải lót; Mũ; Gấu áo/quần; May đồ trang trí nhà; Nẹp nút áo; Túi; Chần bông; Lưng quần; Khác
sv: Användningsområde för mellanlägg: Applikation; Väskor och kassar; Knapphål; Kragar och manschetter; Pysselprojekt; Broderistabilisering; Infodringar; Hattar; Fållar; Heminredningssömnad; Knäppkanter; Fickor; Kviltning; Midjeband; Annat
zh-CN: 粘合衬适用领域: 贴花; 箱包和托特包; 锁眼; 领口和袖口; 手工项目; 刺绣固定; 贴边; 帽子; 下摆; 家居装饰缝纫; 门襟; 口袋; 绗缝; 裤腰/裙腰; 其他
lt-LT: Paklijavimo medžiagos naudojimo sritis: Aplikacija; Krepšiai ir rankinės; Sagų kilpos; Apykaklės ir rankogaliai; Rankdarbių projektai; Siuvinėjimo stabilizavimas; Apsiuvai; Kepurės; Palankai; Namų dekoro siuvimas; Užsegimo juostos; Kišenės; Skiautinių dygsniavimas; Juosmenys; Kita